District of Columbia statutes.
42-3173.12

Nature of remedies.

The remedies set forth in this subchapter shall be cumulative and not exclusive.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 452
as added Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 102, 49 DCR 1468